District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.19j

Health and safety standards for TANF and POWER recipients.

TANF and POWER applicants and recipients participating in job search, job readiness, work, or self-sufficiency activities shall be subject to the same health and safety standards established under District and federal laws that apply to other individuals in comparable activities who are not TANF or POWER applicants or recipients.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 519j
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(w), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-205.19j.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(w) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary addition of section, see note to § 4-205.19a.